New Jersey, session 222, A2003.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no asset of any pension fund or annuity fund under the jurisdiction of the Division of Investment in the Department of the Treasury, or its successor, shall be invested in stock, debt, or other security of any company that is engaged in a government contract or similar business operation involving the collection or manipulation of personal data of individuals or facilitating the surveillance of individuals without a warrant signed by a State or federal judge or a lawful court order for the purpose of obtaining evidence of an individuals citizenship or immigration status. b.    The State Investment Council and the Director of the Division of Investment shall contract with an independent research firm that specializes in data privacy and security, and after reviewing the recommendations of, and consulting with, that independent research firm and the State Chief Technology Officer, identify a list of companies that engage in the prohibited activities identified in subsection a. of this section.  The council and director shall, in accordance with sound investment criteria and consistent with fiduciary obligations, take appropriate action to divest of any such stock, debt, or other security, whether owned directly or held through separate accounts or any commingled funds, held in violation of subsection a. of this section.  Divestment pursuant to this section shall be completed by January 1 of the second year following the effective date of P.L.     , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). This subsection shall not be construed to require the premature or imprudent sale, redemption, divestment, or withdrawal of an investment. c.    The council and the director shall submit a report, within 120 days of the effective date of P.L.     , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and on February 1 of each year thereafter, to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature that identifies the companies and funds from which divestment is required under subsection a. of this section.  The report shall be filed by the director and shall include all investments sold, redeemed, divested, or withdrawn in compliance with this section, and all prohibited investments from which divestment has not occurred under this section.  The report shall provide a description of the progress that the division has made since the previous report in implementing subsection a. of this section. d.    The members of the State Investment Council, jointly and individually, and State officers and employees involved therewith, shall be indemnified and held harmless by the State of New Jersey from all claims, demands, suits, actions, damages, judgments, costs, charges, and expenses, including court costs and attorneys fees, and against all liability, losses, and damages that these council members, State officers, and State employees may sustain by reason or any decision to restrict, reduce, or eliminate investments pursuant to this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.